Wisconsin, session 2025, SB396.
do enact as follows:SB396,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB396,2,84(1) Veterans outreach and recovery program. In the schedule under s. 520.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of veterans affairs under s. 120.485 (2) (qs), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $512,900 to 2increase the authorized FTE positions to the department of veterans affairs by 7.0 3SEG positions to increase services under the veterans outreach and recovery 4program. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the 5department of veterans affairs under s. 20.485 (2) (qs), the dollar amount for fiscal 6year 2026-27 is increased by $602,800 to provide funding for the positions 7authorized under this subsection to increase services under the veterans outreach 8and recovery program.SB396,29Section 2. Effective date.SB396,2,1110(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 11publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.SB396,2,1212